Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-16,131 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-16,131. (a) A pharmacist may initiate therapy within the
framework of a statewide protocol for the following health conditions:
(1) Influenza;
(2) streptococcal pharyngitis; or
(3) urinary tract infection; or
(4) COVID-19.
(b) The collaborative drug therapy management advisory committee
established pursuant to K.S.A. 65-1677, and amendments thereto, may
adopt a statewide protocol for each condition listed in subsection (a). In
establishing such statewide protocols, the committee shall specify:
(1) The medications or categories of medications included in the
protocol for each health condition;
(2) the training or qualifications required for pharmacists to
implement the protocols;
(3) requirements for documentation and maintenance of records,
including patient inclusion and exclusion criteria, medical referral criteria,
patient assessment tools based on current clinical guidelines, follow-up
monitoring or care plans and the pharmacist's adherence to the applicable
protocols; and
(4) communication requirements, including, but not limited to,
notification to the patient's personal or primary care provider.
(c) The board may deny an application or renewal or revoke or
suspend the license of a pharmacist upon a finding that the pharmacist has
violated the provisions of this section or failed to practice within the
framework of statewide protocols established pursuant to this section by
the collaborative drug therapy management advisory committee.
(d) This section shall take effect and be in force on and after July 1,

HB 2157 2
2022.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-16,131 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.